Hawaii statutes.
§432:1-204 Foreign societies.
Any foreign society subject to this article shall not be excused or relieved
from compliance with this article by reason of the nonresidence of its
members. Upon a showing to the satisfaction of the commissioner that it is
impracticable and would work a hardship to comply with section 432:1-202(b) the
commissioner shall permit the society to qualify in this respect upon its
appointment of a resident agent, in the same manner and subject to the same
conditions as are provided for in the case of foreign corporations under the
general laws on corporations. Section 432:1-202(b) shall likewise be
applicable to the agent. [L 1989, c 195, §9]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next